sk-SK: Typ tlmenia blany bubna: Externý kontrolný prstenec; Integrované tlmiace body; Interný tlmiaci prstenec; Bez zabudovaného tlmenia; Odvetrávaný tlmiaci systém; Iné
en: Drum head muffling type: External control ring; Integrated damping dots; Internal muffling ring; No built-in muffling; Vented muffling system; Other
zh-CN: 鼓皮消音类型: 外置控制圈; 一体式弱音点; 内置弱音圈; 无内置弱音; 气孔弱音系统; 其他
bg-BG: Тип заглушаване на кожата на барабана: Външен контролен пръстен; Интегрирани заглушаващи точки; Вътрешен заглушаващ пръстен; Без вградено заглушаване; Вентилирана заглушаваща система; Друго
el: Τύπος σιγαστήρα κεφαλής τυμπάνου: Εξωτερικός δακτύλιος ελέγχου; Ενσωματωμένα σημεία απόσβεσης; Εσωτερικός δακτύλιος σίγασης; Χωρίς ενσωματωμένη σίγαση; Αεριζόμενο σύστημα σίγασης; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tip de amortizor capete de tobe: Inel de control extern; Puncte de amortizare integrate; Inel de amortizare intern; Fără amortizare încorporată; Sistem de amortizare ventilat; Altele
tr: Davul derisi sönümleme türü: Harici kontrol halkası; Entegre sönümleme noktaları; Dahili susturucu halka; Dahili susturucu yok; Hava delikli susturucu sistemi; Diğer
fr: Type d’atténuation de la peau de tambour: Anneau de contrôle externe; Points d’atténuation intégrés; Anneau d’atténuation interne; Aucune atténuation intégrée; Système d’atténuation ventilé; Autre
zh-TW: 鼓皮消音類型: 外部控制環; 整合式制音點; 內部消音環; 無內建消音; 排氣消音系統; 其他
sv: Typ av trumskinnsdämpning: Extern dämpring; Integrerade dämpningspunkter; Intern dämpring; Ingen inbyggd dämpning; Ventilerat dämpningssystem; Övrigt
fi: Rumpukalvon äänenvaimennustyyppi: Ulkoinen vaimennusrengas; Integroidut vaimennuspisteet; Sisäinen vaimennusrengas; Ei sisäänrakennettua vaimennusta; Tuuletettu vaimennusjärjestelmä; Muu
da: Type dæmpning af trommeskind: Udvendig kontrolring; Integrerede dæmpepunkter; Indvendig dæmpering; Ingen indbygget dæmpning; Ventileret dæmpningssystem; Andet
ko: 드럼 헤드 뮤트 유형: 외부 컨트롤 링; 내장 댐핑 도트; 내부 머플링 링; 내장 머플링 없음; 통기형 머플링 시스템; 기타
ru: Тип приглушения барабанной кожи: Внешнее демпферное кольцо; Встроенные демпферные точки; Внутреннее демпферное кольцо; Без встроенного демпфера; Вентилируемая демпферная система; Другое
pl: Typ tłumienia naciągu perkusyjnego: Zewnętrzny pierścień tłumiący; Zintegrowane łatki tłumiące; Wewnętrzny pierścień tłumiący; Brak wbudowanego tłumienia; Wentylowany system tłumienia; Inny
it: Tipo di smorzamento della testa del tamburo: Anello di controllo esterno; Dot di smorzamento integrati; Anello di smorzamento interno; Nessuno smorzamento integrato; Sistema di smorzamento ventilato; Altro
de: Dämpfungstyp des Trommelfells: Externer Dämpfungsring; Integrierte Dämpfungs-Dots; Interner Dämpfungsring; Keine integrierte Dämpfung; Belüftetes Dämpfungssystem; Sonstige
ja: ドラムヘッドミュートタイプ: 外部コントロールリング; 内蔵ダンピングドット; 内部マッフリングリング; 内蔵マッフリングなし; ベント付きマッフリングシステム; その他
pt-BR: Tipo de abafamento da pele de tambor: Anel de controle externo; Pontos de amortecimento integrados; Anel de abafamento interno; Sem abafamento embutido; Sistema de abafamento ventilado; Outro
nl: Drumvel demping type: Externe dempring; Geïntegreerde dempingsdots; Interne dempring; Geen ingebouwde demping; Geventileerd dempingssysteem; Anders
es: Tipo de atenuación del parche del tambor: Anillo de control externo; Puntos de amortiguación integrados; Anillo de amortiguación interno; Sin amortiguación integrada; Sistema de amortiguación ventilado; Otro
pt-PT: tipo de abafador de pele de tambor: Anel de controlo externo; Pontos de amortecimento integrados; Anel de abafamento interno; Sem abafamento integrado; Sistema de abafamento ventilado; Outro
nb: Dempingstype for trommeskinn: Utvendig kontrollring; Integrerte dempepunkter; Innvendig dempering; Ingen innebygd demping; Ventilert dempesystem; Annet
hu: Dobfej hangtompító típusa: Külső szabályozógyűrű; Beépített tompítópontok; Belső tompítógyűrű; Nincs beépített tompítás; Szellőzős tompítórendszer; Egyéb
vi: Loại giảm âm mặt trống: Vòng kiểm soát mặt ngoài; Điểm giảm âm tích hợp; Vòng hãm âm trong; Không tích hợp hãm âm; Hệ thống hãm âm có lỗ thông hơi; Khác
th: ประเภทการลดเสียงสะท้อนของหนังกลอง: วงแหวนควบคุมเสียงด้านนอก; จุดซับเสียงแบบในตัว; วงแหวนซับเสียงด้านใน; ไม่มีซับเสียงในตัว; ระบบซับเสียงแบบมีช่องระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta prigušivanja membrane bubnja: Vanjski kontrolni prsten; Integrirane točke za prigušivanje; Unutarnji prsten za prigušivanje; Bez ugrađenog prigušivanja; Sustav prigušivanja s otvorima; Ostalo
sl-SI: Vrsta dušilca bobna: Zunanji dušilni obroč; Vgrajene dušilne pike; Notranji dušilni obroč; Brez vgrajenega dušenja; Zračen dušilni sistem; Drugo
cs: Typ tlumení blány bubnu: Vnější tlumicí kroužek; Integrované tlumicí body; Vnitřní tlumicí kroužek; Bez vestavěného tlumení; Systém tlumení s odvětráváním; Ostatní
lt-LT: Būgno membranos slopinimo tipas: Išorinis valdymo žiedas; Integruoti slopinimo taškai; Vidinis slopinimo žiedas; Be integruoto slopinimo; Slopinimo sistema su angomis; Kita